Idaho, session 2026, H0763.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The Foreign Adversary Investment Act
will ensure that the State of Idaho's public investment dollars are not
put at risk in countries of concern and do not fund the development of the
military technologies and surveillance tools of foreign adversaries that
impede the furthering of the State of Idaho's interests and the interests of
the United States of America, by prohibiting the future investment of public
pension dollars and university endowment funds in countries of concern.
SECTION 2. That Title 57, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 21, Title 57, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21
FOREIGN ADVERSARY INVESTMENT ACT
57-2101. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, organization, associa-
tion, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, lim-
ited liability partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or
business association, including wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned
subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business
associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit.
(2) "Domicile" means either the country in which a company is regis-
tered, where the company's affairs are primarily completed, or where the ma-
jority of ownership share is held.
(3) "Foreign adversary" means any foreign country, foreign government,
or foreign government person engaged in a long-term pattern of serious in-
stances of conduct significantly adverse to the national security of the
United States or security and safety of United States persons as determined
in 15 CFR 791.4. The list of foreign adversaries provided in 15 CFR 791.4,
as it existed on February 1, 2026, includes the People's Republic of China,
including the Hong Kong special administrative region and the Macau special
administrative region, the Republic of Cuba, the Islamic Republic of Iran,
the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Russian Federation, and the
Venezuelan regime of Nicolás Maduro.


(4) "Governmental entity" means the state of Idaho, any state agency,
any political subdivision within the state of Idaho, any public institution
of higher education within the state of Idaho, any local government within
the state of Idaho, any taxing district within the state of Idaho, or any
agency or organization controlled by such entities.
(5) "Investment" means any transfer of funds in any active or passive
structure, whether direct or indirect, that seeks to generate revenue or ac-
complish any other gain, including any non-monetary gain.
(6) "State-managed fund" means any short-term or long-term investment
structure that is managed, run, controlled, or otherwise overseen by any
governmental entity that such governmental entity has primary discretion
over or vested interest in. This definition shall apply to any fund that
is managed by a third-party entity, such as a fiduciary, but subject to the
purview or direction of a governmental entity and populated with any funds
from such governmental entity. This shall include but is not limited to:
(a) Public pension funds, public retirement funds, or other funds that
are sponsored, maintained, or contributed to or required to be con-
tributed to by any governmental entity;
(b) Investment funds, rainy day funds, savings accounts, or other in-
vestment structures of any governmental entity; and
(c) University or college endowments, trusts, or other investment
structures that constitute, wholly or in part, a public institution of
higher education's investable assets.
(7) "State-owned enterprise" means any company owned or controlled,
wholly or in part, by a government or by individuals acting in official gov-
ernment capacities in any form.
57-2102. INVESTMENTS IN FOREIGN ADVERSARIES PROHIBITED. (1) On and
after July 1, 2026:
(a) No state-managed fund shall make new investments in any foreign ad-
versary, state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, company domi-
ciled within a foreign adversary, or company owned or controlled by a
foreign adversary, state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, com-
pany domiciled within a foreign adversary, or any other entity within a
foreign adversary; and
(b) All state-managed funds shall be prohibited from making new invest-
ments or depositing public funds in any bank that is domiciled or has its
principal place of business in a foreign adversary.
(2) This section shall not apply with respect to funds invested prior to
July 1, 2026.
57-2103. LIMITATIONS. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
limit, inhibit, conflict, impede, or otherwise interfere with required fi-
nancial safeguards, fiduciary requirements, or other sound investment cri-
teria that any state-managed fund is subject to or required to comply with
pursuant to applicable federal law.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,


such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.